Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.657.120

Rules.

The superintendent of public instruction and the state board of education may each adopt rules in accordance with chapter 34.05 RCW as necessary to implement this chapter.

[ 2010 c 235 s 113.]

NOTES:

Finding—2010 c 235: See note following RCW 28A.405.245.